Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-283
Oral communication, defined.

Oral communication means any oral communication uttered by a person exhibiting an expectation that such communication is not subject to interception under circumstances justifying such expectation but does not include any electronic communication.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 145.

Pursuant to subsection (12) of this section (recodified in 2002 as section 86-283), there is no objective expectation of privacy in face-to-face conversations occurring in jail visiting rooms. State v. Strohl, 255 Neb. 918, 587 N.W.2d. 675 (1999).